New Jersey, session 221, A2381.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented: "Biotechnology" means any technique that uses living organisms, or parts of living organisms, to make or modify products, to improve plants or animals, or to develop micro-organisms for specific uses; including the industrial use of recombinant DNA, cell fusion, and novel bioprocessing techniques. "Custodian of a government record" or "custodian" means in the case of a municipality, the municipal clerk and in the case of any other public agency, the officer officially designated by formal action of that agency's director or governing body, as the case may be. "Government record" or "record" means any paper, written or printed book, document, drawing, map, plan, photograph, microfilm, data processed or image processed document, information stored or maintained electronically or by sound-recording or in a similar device, or any copy thereof, that has been made, maintained or kept on file in the course of his or its official business by any officer, commission, agency or authority of the State or of any political subdivision thereof, including subordinate boards thereof, or that has been received in the course of his or its official business by any such officer, commission, agency, or authority of the State or of any political subdivision thereof, including subordinate boards thereof.  The terms shall not include inter-agency or intra-agency advisory, consultative, or deliberative material. A government record shall not include the following information which is deemed to be confidential for the purposes of P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented: information received by a member of the Legislature from a constituent or information held by a member of the Legislature concerning a constituent, including, but not limited to, information in written form or contained in any e-mail or computer data base, or in any telephone record whatsoever, unless it is information the constituent is required by law to transmit; any memorandum, correspondence, notes, report or other communication prepared by, or for, the specific use of a member of the Legislature in the course of the member's official duties, except that this provision shall not apply to an otherwise publicly-accessible report which is required by law to be submitted to the Legislature or its members; any copy, reproduction or facsimile of any photograph, negative or print, including instant photographs and videotapes of the body, or any portion of the body, of a deceased person, taken by or for the medical examiner at the scene of death or in the course of a post mortem examination or autopsy made by or caused to be made by the medical examiner except: when used in a criminal action or proceeding in this State which relates to the death of that person, for the use as a court of this State permits, by order after good cause has been shown and after written notification of the request for the court order has been served at least five days before the order is made upon the county prosecutor for the county in which the post mortem examination or autopsy occurred, for use in the field of forensic pathology or for use in medical or scientific education or research, or for use by any law enforcement agency in this State or any other state or federal law enforcement agency; criminal investigatory records; the portion of any criminal record concerning a person's detection, apprehension, arrest, detention, trial or disposition for unlawful manufacturing, distributing, or dispensing, or possessing or having under control with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense, marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (11) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5, or a lesser amount of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (12) of subsection b. of that section, or a violation of either of those paragraphs and a violation of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1987, c.101 (C.2C:35-7) or subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1997, c.327 (C.2C:35-7.1) for distributing, dispensing, or possessing, or having under control with intent to distribute or dispense, on or within 1,000 feet of any school property, or on or within 500 feet of the real property comprising a public housing facility, public park, or public building, or for obtaining, possessing, using, being under the influence of, or failing to make lawful disposition of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection a., or subsection b., or subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, or for a violation of any of those provisions and a violation of N.J.S.2C:36-2 for using or possessing with intent to use drug paraphernalia with that marijuana or hashish; victims' records, except that a victim of a crime shall have access to the victim's own records; any written request by a crime victim for a record to which the victim is entitled to access as provided in this section, including, but not limited to, any law enforcement agency report, domestic violence offense report, and temporary or permanent restraining order; personal firearms records, except for use by any person authorized by law to have access to these records or for use by any government agency, including any court or law enforcement agency, for purposes of the administration of justice; personal identifying information received by the Division of Fish and Wildlife in the Department of Environmental Protection in connection with the issuance of any license authorizing hunting with a firearm.  For the purposes of this paragraph, personal identifying information shall include, but not be limited to, identity, name, address, social security number, telephone number, fax number, driver's license number, email address, or social media address of any applicant or licensee; trade secrets and proprietary commercial or financial information obtained from any source.  For the purposes of this paragraph, trade secrets shall include data processing software obtained by a public body under a licensing agreement which prohibits its disclosure; any record within the attorney-client privilege.  This paragraph shall not be construed as exempting from access attorney or consultant bills or invoices except that such bills or invoices may be redacted to remove any information protected by the attorney-client privilege; administrative or technical information regarding computer hardware, software and networks which, if disclosed, would jeopardize computer security; emergency or security information or procedures for any buildings or facility which, if disclosed, would jeopardize security of the building or facility or persons therein; security measures and surveillance techniques which, if disclosed, would create a risk to the safety of persons, property, electronic data or software; information which, if disclosed, would give an advantage to competitors or bidders; information generated by or on behalf of public employers or public employees in connection with any sexual harassment complaint filed with a public employer or with any grievance filed by or against an individual or in connection with collective negotiations, including documents and statements of strategy or negotiating position; information which is a communication between a public agency and its insurance carrier, administrative service organization or risk management office; information which is to be kept confidential pursuant to court order; any copy of form DD-214, NGB-22, or that form, issued by the United States Government, or any other certificate of honorable discharge, or copy thereof, from active service or the reserves of a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, or from service in the organized militia of the State, that has been filed by an individual with a public agency, except that a veteran or the veteran's spouse or surviving spouse shall have access to the veteran's own records; any copy of an oath of allegiance, oath of office or any affirmation taken upon assuming the duties of any public office, or that oath or affirmation, taken by a current or former officer or employee in any public office or position in this State or in any county or municipality of this State, including members of the Legislative Branch, Executive Branch, Judicial Branch, and all law enforcement entities, except that the full name, title, and oath date of that person contained therein shall not be deemed confidential; that portion of any document which discloses the social security number, credit card number, unlisted telephone number or driver license number of any person, or, in accordance with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2), that portion of any document which discloses the home address, whether a primary or secondary residence, of any active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer, prosecutor, [or] law enforcement officer, or probation officer, or, as defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1), any immediate family member thereof; except for use by any government agency, including any court or law enforcement agency, in carrying out its functions, or any private person or entity acting on behalf thereof, or any private person or entity seeking to enforce payment of court-ordered child support; except with respect to the disclosure of driver information by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission as permitted by section 2 of P.L.1997, c.188 (C.39:2-3.4); and except that a social security number contained in a record required by law to be made, maintained or kept on file by a public agency shall be disclosed when access to the document or disclosure of that information is not otherwise prohibited by State or federal law, regulation or order or by State statute, resolution of either or both houses of the Legislature, Executive Order of the Governor, rule of court or regulation promulgated under the authority of any statute or executive order of the Governor; a list of persons identifying themselves as being in need of special assistance in the event of an emergency maintained by a municipality for public safety purposes pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2017, c.266 (C.40:48-2.67); and a list of persons identifying themselves as being in need of special assistance in the event of an emergency maintained by a county for public safety purposes pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2011, c.178 (C.App.A:9-43.13). A government record shall not include, with regard to any public institution of higher education, the following information which is deemed to be privileged and confidential: pedagogical, scholarly and/or academic research records and/or the specific details of any research project conducted under the auspices of a public higher education institution in New Jersey, including, but not limited to, research, development information, testing procedures, or information regarding test participants, related to the development or testing of any pharmaceutical or pharmaceutical delivery system, except that a custodian may not deny inspection of a government record or part thereof that gives the name, title, expenditures, source and amounts of funding and date when the final project summary of any research will be available; test questions, scoring keys and other examination data pertaining to the administration of an examination for employment or academic examination; records of pursuit of charitable contributions or records containing the identity of a donor of a gift if the donor requires non-disclosure of the donor's identity as a condition of making the gift provided that the donor has not received any benefits of or from the institution of higher education in connection with such gift other than a request for memorialization or dedication; valuable or rare collections of books or documents obtained by gift, grant, bequest or devise conditioned upon limited public access; information contained on individual admission applications; and information concerning student records or grievance or disciplinary proceedings against a student to the extent disclosure would reveal the identity of the student. "Personal firearms record" means any information contained in a background investigation conducted by the chief of police, the county prosecutor, or the Superintendent of State Police, of any applicant for a permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or firearms registration; any application for a permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or firearms registration; any document reflecting the issuance or denial of a permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or firearms registration; and any permit to purchase a handgun, firearms identification card license, or any firearms license, certification, certificate, form of register, or registration statement.  For the purposes of this paragraph, information contained in a background investigation shall include, but not be limited to, identity, name, address, social security number, phone number, fax number, driver's license number, email address, social media address of any applicant, licensee, registrant or permit holder. "Public agency" or "agency" means any of the principal departments in the Executive Branch of State Government, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by such department; the Legislature of the State and any office, board, bureau or commission within or created by the Legislative Branch; and any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality or agency.  The terms also mean any political subdivision of the State or combination of political subdivisions, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by a political subdivision of the State or combination of political subdivisions, and any independent authority, commission, instrumentality or agency created by a political subdivision or combination of political subdivisions. Probation officer means a person whose public duties include the supervision of persons convicted or charged with crimes and offense in this State, as defined by law or contract between the Judiciary and the Probation Association of New Jersey or its successor and shall include, but not limited to those employees who are in the following titles referred to in those contracts: Probation Officer, Senior Probation Officer, Master Probation Officer, Substance Abuse Evaluator, Family Court Coordinator, Assistant Child Placement Review Coordinator, or Bilingual Community Outreach Worker.  The term also shall include all titles covered by Appendix A of the Professional Supervisory Union Agreement between Judiciary and the Probation Association of New Jersey, including but not limited to the informal title of Team Leader, Court Service Supervisor 1, Court Service Supervisor 2, and Court Service Supervisor 3. "Law enforcement agency" means a public agency, or part thereof, determined by the Attorney General to have law enforcement responsibilities. "Law enforcement officer" means a person whose public duties include the power to act as an officer for the detection, apprehension, arrest and conviction of offenders against the laws of this State. "Constituent" means any State resident or other person communicating with a member of the Legislature. "Judicial officer" means any active, formerly active, or retired federal, state, county, or municipal judge, including a judge of the Tax Court and any other court of limited jurisdiction established, altered, or abolished by law, a judge of the Office of Administrative Law, a judge of the Division of Workers' Compensation, and any other judge established by law who serves in the executive branch. "Member of the Legislature" means any person elected or selected to serve in the New Jersey Senate or General Assembly. "Criminal investigatory record" means a record which is not required by law to be made, maintained or kept on file that is held by a law enforcement agency which pertains to any criminal investigation or related civil enforcement proceeding. "Victim's record" means an individually-identifiable file or document held by a victims' rights agency which pertains directly to a victim of a crime except that a victim of a crime shall have access to the victim's own records. "Victim of a crime" means a person who has suffered personal or psychological injury or death or incurs loss of or injury to personal or real property as a result of a crime, or if such a person is deceased or incapacitated, a member of that person's immediate family. "Victims' rights agency" means a public agency, or part thereof, the primary responsibility of which is providing services, including, but not limited to, food, shelter, or clothing, medical, psychiatric, psychological or legal services or referrals, information and referral services, counseling and support services, or financial services to victims of crimes, including victims of sexual assault, domestic violence, violent crime, child endangerment, child abuse or child neglect, and the Victims of Crime Compensation Board, established pursuant to P.L.1971, c.317 (C.52:4B-1 et seq.) and continued as the Victims of Crime Compensation Office pursuant to P.L.2007, c.95 (C.52:4B-3.2 et al.) and Reorganization Plan No. 001-2008. (cf: P.L.2021, c.371, s.10) 2.    Section 6 of P.L.2001, c.404 (C.47:1A-5) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a.  The custodian of a government record shall permit the record to be inspected, examined, and copied by any person during regular business hours; or in the case of a municipality having a population of 5,000 or fewer according to the most recent federal decennial census, a board of education having a total district enrollment of 500 or fewer, or a public authority having less than $10 million in assets, during not less than six regular business hours over not less than three business days per week or the entity's regularly-scheduled business hours, whichever is less; unless a government record is exempt from public access by: P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented; any other statute; resolution of either or both houses of the Legislature; regulation promulgated under the authority of any statute or Executive Order of the Governor; Executive Order of the Governor; Rules of Court; any federal law; federal regulation; or federal order. Prior to allowing access to any government record, the custodian thereof shall redact from that record any information which discloses the social security number, credit card number, unlisted telephone number, or driver license number of any person, or, in accordance with section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2), the home address, whether a primary or secondary residence, of any active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer, prosecutor, [or] law enforcement officer, or probation officer, or, as defined in section 1 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1), any immediate family member thereof; except for use by any government agency, including any court or law enforcement agency, in carrying out its functions, or any private person or entity acting on behalf thereof, or any private person or entity seeking to enforce payment of court-ordered child support; except with respect to the disclosure of driver information by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission as permitted by section 2 of P.L.1997, c.188 (C.39:2-3.4); and except that a social security number contained in a record required by law to be made, maintained or kept on file by a public agency shall be disclosed when access to the document or disclosure of that information is not otherwise prohibited by State or federal law, regulation or order or by State statute, resolution of either or both houses of the Legislature, Executive Order of the Governor, rule of court or regulation promulgated under the authority of any statute or executive order of the Governor.  Except where an agency can demonstrate an emergent need, a regulation that limits access to government records shall not be retroactive in effect or applied to deny a request for access to a government record that is pending before the agency, the council or a court at the time of the adoption of the regulation. b.    (1)  A copy or copies of a government record may be purchased by any person upon payment of the fee prescribed by law or regulation.  Except as otherwise provided by law or regulation and except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the fee assessed for the duplication of a government record embodied in the form of printed matter shall be $0.05 per letter size page or smaller, and $0.07 per legal size page or larger.  If a public agency can demonstrate that its actual costs for duplication of a government record exceed the foregoing rates, the public agency shall be permitted to charge the actual cost of duplicating the record.  The actual cost of duplicating the record, upon which all copy fees are based, shall be the cost of materials and supplies used to make a copy of the record, but shall not include the cost of labor or other overhead expenses associated with making the copy except as provided for in subsection c. of this section.  Access to electronic records and non-printed materials shall be provided free of charge, but the public agency may charge for the actual costs of any needed supplies such as computer discs. (2)   No fee shall be charged to a victim of a crime for a copy or copies of a record to which the crime victim is entitled to access, as provided in section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1). c.     Whenever the nature, format, manner of collation, or volume of a government record embodied in the form of printed matter to be inspected, examined, or copied pursuant to this section is such that the record cannot be reproduced by ordinary document copying equipment in ordinary business size or involves an extraordinary expenditure of time and effort to accommodate the request, the public agency may charge, in addition to the actual cost of duplicating the record, a special service charge that shall be reasonable and shall be based upon the actual direct cost of providing the copy or copies; provided, however, that in the case of a municipality, rates for the duplication of particular records when the actual cost of copying exceeds the foregoing rates shall be established in advance by ordinance.  The requestor shall have the opportunity to review and object to the charge prior to it being incurred. d.    A custodian shall permit access to a government record and provide a copy thereof in the medium requested if the public agency maintains the record in that medium.  If the public agency does not maintain the record in the medium requested, the custodian shall either convert the record to the medium requested or provide a copy in some other meaningful medium.  If a request is for a record: (1) in a medium not routinely used by the agency; (2) not routinely developed or maintained by an agency; or (3) requiring a substantial amount of manipulation or programming of information technology, the agency may charge, in addition to the actual cost of duplication, a special charge that shall be reasonable and shall be based on the cost for any extensive use of information technology, or for the labor cost of personnel providing the service, that is actually incurred by the agency or attributable to the agency for the programming, clerical, and supervisory assistance required, or both. e.     Immediate access ordinarily shall be granted to budgets, bills, vouchers, contracts, including collective negotiations agreements and individual employment contracts, and public employee salary and overtime information. f.     The custodian of a public agency shall adopt a form for the use of any person who requests access to a government record held or controlled by the public agency.  The form shall provide space for the name, address, and phone number of the requestor and a brief description of the government record sought.  The form shall include space for the custodian to indicate which record will be made available, when the record will be available, and the fees to be charged.  The form shall also include the following: (1) specific directions and procedures for requesting a record; (2) a statement as to whether prepayment of fees or a deposit is required; (3) the time period within which the public agency is required by P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented, to make the record available; (4) a statement of the requestor's right to challenge a decision by the public agency to deny access and the procedure for filing an appeal; (5) space for the custodian to list reasons if a request is denied in whole or in part; (6) space for the requestor to sign and date the form; (7) space for the custodian to sign and date the form if the request is fulfilled or denied.  The custodian may require a deposit against costs for reproducing documents sought through an anonymous request whenever the custodian anticipates that the information thus requested will cost in excess of $5 to reproduce. g.    A request for access to a government record shall be in writing and hand-delivered, mailed, transmitted electronically, or otherwise conveyed to the appropriate custodian.  A custodian shall promptly comply with a request to inspect, examine, copy, or provide a copy of a government record.  If the custodian is unable to comply with a request for access, the custodian shall indicate the specific basis therefor on the request form and promptly return it to the requestor.  The custodian shall sign and date the form and provide the requestor with a copy thereof.  If the custodian of a government record asserts that part of a particular record is exempt from public access pursuant to P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented, the custodian shall delete or excise from a copy of the record that portion which the custodian asserts is exempt from access and shall promptly permit access to the remainder of the record.  If the government record requested is temporarily unavailable because it is in use or in storage, the custodian shall so advise the requestor and shall make arrangements to promptly make available a copy of the record.  If a request for access to a government record would substantially disrupt agency operations, the custodian may deny access to the record after attempting to reach a reasonable solution with the requestor that accommodates the interests of the requestor and the agency. h.    Any officer or employee of a public agency who receives a request for access to a government record shall forward the request to the custodian of the record or direct the requestor to the custodian of the record. i.     (1)  Unless a shorter time period is otherwise provided by statute, regulation, or executive order, a custodian of a government record shall grant access to a government record or deny a request for access to a government record as soon as possible, but not later than seven business days after receiving the request, provided that the record is currently available and not in storage or archived.  In the event a custodian fails to respond within seven business days after receiving a request, the failure to respond shall be deemed a denial of the request, unless the requestor has elected not to provide a name, address or telephone number, or other means of contacting the requestor.  If the requestor has elected not to provide a name, address, or telephone number, or other means of contacting the requestor, the custodian shall not be required to respond until the requestor reappears before the custodian seeking a response to the original request.  If the government record is in storage or archived, the requestor shall be so advised within seven business days after the custodian receives the request.  The requestor shall be advised by the custodian when the record can be made available.  If the record is not made available by that time, access shall be deemed denied. (2)  During a period declared pursuant to the laws of this State as a state of emergency, public health emergency, or state of local disaster emergency, the deadlines by which to respond to a request for, or grant or deny access to, a government record under paragraph (1) of this subsection or subsection e. of this section shall not apply, provided, however, that the custodian of a government record shall make a reasonable effort, as the circumstances permit, to respond to a request for access to a government record within seven business days or as soon as possible thereafter. j.     A custodian shall post prominently in public view in the part or parts of the office or offices of the custodian that are open to or frequented by the public a statement that sets forth in clear, concise and specific terms the right to appeal a denial of, or failure to provide, access to a government record by any person for inspection, examination, or copying or for purchase of copies thereof and the procedure by which an appeal may be filed. k.    The files maintained by the Office of the Public Defender that relate to the handling of any case shall be considered confidential and shall not be open to inspection by any person unless authorized by law, court order, or the State Public Defender. (cf: P.L.2021, c.371, s.11) 3.    Section 1 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a. As used in this act, P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1 et al.): "Authorized person" means a covered person or any of the following persons hereby authorized to submit or revoke a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of a home address on behalf of a covered person: (1)   on behalf of any federal judge, a designee of the United States Marshals Service or of the clerk of any United States District Court, provided that the designee submits the affirmation required under subsection d. of section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2) signed by each federal judge for whom a request or revocation is made; (2)   on behalf of any covered person who is deceased or medically or psychologically incapacitated, a person acting on behalf of the covered person as a designated trustee, as an estate executor, or pursuant to a written power of attorney or other legal instrument, provided that the person signs and submits the affirmation required under subsection d. of section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2) in the stead of the covered person; and (3)   on behalf of any immediate family member who is a minor and who is otherwise entitled to address redaction or nondisclosure pursuant to this act, the parent or legal guardian thereof. "Covered person" means an active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer or law enforcement officer, as those terms are defined by section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1), [or] prosecutor, or probation officer and any immediate family member residing in the same household as the judicial officer, law enforcement officer, [or] prosecutor, or probation officer. "Immediate family member" means a spouse, child, or parent of, or any other family member related by blood or by law to, an active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer or law enforcement officer, as defined by section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1), or prosecutor and who resides in the same household as the judicial officer, law enforcement officer, or prosecutor. b.    There is established in the Department of Community Affairs an office to be known as the Office of Information Privacy. The office shall be led by a director, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Commissioner of Community Affairs and who may hire staff as necessary. c.     The director shall establish: (1)   a secure portal through which an authorized person may submit or revoke a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of a covered person's home address from certain records and Internet postings, as provided in section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2); and such requests shall not be subject to disclosure under P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.); (2)   a process by which an authorized person may petition the director for reconsideration of a denial of such request or any revocations thereof; (3)   a process by which a person or entity may request receipt of a record that does not contain redactions, or of information that is not disclosable, resulting from subsection a. of section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2); and (4)   a process for the evaluation of any other exceptions to the requirement for redaction or nondisclosure pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-2), whether categorical or individualized. The director may grant an exception to any person or entity for the receipt of the unredacted records or information pursuant to this process. d.    The director shall evaluate and either approve or deny a request submitted pursuant to subsection c. of this section and any revocations thereof. e.     (1)  The director may enter into any agreement or contract necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. (2)   The director may issue any guidance, guidelines, decisions, or rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules and regulations shall be effective immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law for a period not to exceed 18 months, and shall, thereafter, be amended, adopted, or readopted in accordance with the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2021, c.371, s.1) 4.    Section 1 of P.L.2015, c.226 (C.2C:20-31.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  For the purposes of this section: "Authorized person" means a covered person or any of the following persons hereby authorized to submit or revoke a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of a home address or unpublished telephone number on behalf of a covered person pursuant to subsection c. of this section: (1)   on behalf of any federal judge, a designee of the United States Marshals Service or of the clerk of any United States District Court; (2)   on behalf of any covered person who is deceased or medically or psychologically incapacitated, a person acting on behalf of the covered person as a designated trustee, as an estate executor, or pursuant to a written power of attorney or other legal instrument; and (3)   on behalf of any immediate family member who is a minor and who is otherwise entitled to address redaction or nondisclosure pursuant to this act, P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1 et al.), the parent or legal guardian thereof. "Covered person" means an active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer or law enforcement officer, as those terms are defined by section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1), [or] prosecutor, or probation officer and any immediate family member residing in the same household as the judicial officer, law enforcement officer, or prosecutor. "Immediate family member" means a spouse, child, or parent of, or any other family member related by blood or by law to, an active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer or law enforcement officer, as those terms are defined by section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1), or prosecutor and who resides in the same household as the judicial officer, law enforcement officer, or prosecutor. "Person" shall not be construed to include in any capacity the custodian of a government record as defined in section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1). b.    Upon notification pursuant to subsection c. of this section, and not later than 10 business days after receipt thereof, a person shall not knowingly, with purpose to expose another to harassment or risk of harm to life or property, or in reckless disregard of the probability of such exposure, post, repost, publish, or republish on the Internet, or otherwise make available, the home address or unpublished home telephone number of any covered person, except in compliance with any court order, law enforcement investigation, or request by a government agency or person duly acting on behalf of the agency. c.     An authorized person, as defined in subsection a. of this section, seeking to prohibit the disclosure of the home address or unpublished home telephone number of any covered person consistent with subsection b. of this section shall provide written notice to the person from whom they are seeking nondisclosure that they are an authorized person and requesting that such person cease the disclosure of such information and remove the protected information from the Internet or where otherwise made available. d.    A reckless violation of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the fourth degree.  A purposeful violation of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the third degree. e.     This section shall not be construed to prohibit a person, business, or association who has received information as unredacted pursuant to the provisions of sections 1 through 3 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1 through C. 47:1B-3) from making the information available consistent with the purposes for which the person, business, or association received the information. A person, business, or association that uses or makes available the information in a way that is inconsistent with the purposes for which the person, business, or association received the information shall be liable as provided pursuant to subsection d. of this section. f.     Nothing herein shall be construed to impose liability on the news media for failure to remove information from previously printed newspapers.  As used in this subsection, "news media" means newspapers, magazines, press associations, news agencies, wire services, or other similar printed means of disseminating news to the general public. (cf: P.L.2021, c.371, s.5) 5.    Section 3 of P.L.2015, c.226 (C.56:8-166.1) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  (1)   Upon notification pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, and not later than 10 business days following receipt thereof, a person, business, or association shall not disclose or re-disclose on the Internet or otherwise make available, the home address or unpublished home telephone number of any covered person, as defined in subsection d. of this section, who has received approval from the Office of Information Privacy for the redaction or nondisclosure of the covered person's address. (2)   An authorized person seeking to prohibit the disclosure of the home address or unpublished home telephone number of any covered person consistent with paragraph (1) of this subsection shall provide written notice to the person from whom they are seeking nondisclosure that they are an authorized person and requesting that the person cease the disclosure of the information and remove the protected information from the Internet or where otherwise made available. (3)   An immediate family member who has provided notice pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection and who no longer resides with the judicial officer, prosecutor, or law enforcement officer shall provide notice to that effect to the person, business, or association not later than 30 days from the date on which the immediate family member no longer resided with the judicial officer, prosecutor, or law enforcement officer. b.    A person, business, or association that violates subsection a. of this section shall be liable to the aggrieved person, who may bring a civil action in the Superior Court. c.     The court may award: (1)   actual damages, but not less than liquidated damages computed at the rate of $1,000 for each violation of this act; (2)   punitive damages upon proof of willful or reckless disregard of the law; (3)   reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred; and (4)   any other preliminary and equitable relief as the court determines to be appropriate. d.    For the purposes of this section: "Authorized person" means a covered person or any of the following persons hereby authorized to submit or revoke a request for the redaction or nondisclosure of a home address on behalf of a covered person: (1)   on behalf of any federal judge, a designee of the United States Marshals Service or of the clerk of any United States District Court; (2)   on behalf of any covered person who is deceased or medically or psychologically incapacitated, a person acting on behalf of the covered person as a designated trustee, as an estate executor, or pursuant to a written power of attorney or other legal instrument; and (3)   on behalf of any immediate family member who is a minor and who is otherwise entitled to address redaction or nondisclosure pursuant to this act, the parent or legal guardian thereof. "Covered person" means an active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer or law enforcement officer, as those terms are defined by section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1), [or] prosecutor, or probation officer and any immediate family member residing in the same household as such judicial officer, law enforcement officer, or prosecutor. "Disclose" shall mean to solicit, sell, manufacture, give, provide, lend, trade, mail, deliver, transfer, post, publish, distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, advertise or offer. "Immediate family member" means a spouse, child, or parent of, or any other family member related by blood or by law to, an active, formerly active, or retired judicial officer or law enforcement officer, as those terms are defined by section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1), or prosecutor and who resides in the same household as such judicial officer, prosecutor, or law enforcement officer. "Person" shall not be construed to include in any capacity the custodian of a government record as defined in section 1 of P.L.1995, c.23 (C.47:1A-1.1). e. This section shall not be construed to prohibit a person, business, or association who has received information as unredacted pursuant to the provisions of sections 1 through 3 of P.L.2021, c.371 (C.47:1B-1 through C.47:1B-3) from making the information available consistent with the purposes for which the person, business, or association received the information. A person, business, or association that uses or makes available the information in a way that is inconsistent with the purposes for which the person, business, or association received the information shall be liable as provided pursuant to subsection c. of this section. f.     Nothing herein shall be construed to impose liability on the news media for failure to remove information from previously printed newspapers.  As used in this subsection, "news media" means newspapers, magazines, press associations, news agencies, wire services, or other similar printed means of disseminating news to the general public. (cf: P.L.2021, c.371, s.8) 6.    This act shall take effect immediately.